Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-105
Corporate limits; extension; contiguous territory, defined.

For purposes of sections 15-104 to 15-106.02, land shall be deemed contiguous although a stream, embankments, or a strip or parcel of land, not more than five hundred feet wide, lies between such land and the corporate limits.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 5, p. 72;

R.S.1913, § 4408;

C.S.1922, § 3784;

C.S.1929, § 15-105;

R.S.1943, § 15-105;

Laws 1972, LB 1147, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 8.
November 14, 2020